Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5081.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1253. (1) By not later than January 1, 2027, the board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy shall ensure that the board or board of directors employs at least 1 teacher who is tasked with assisting pupils with dyslexia and has received not less than 30 hours of training in Orton-Gillingham approach principles. The training described in this subsection must meet standards put forth by the International Dyslexia Association. (2) In addition to the 30 hours of training received under subsection (1), the board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy shall ensure that a teacher described in this section receives not less than 10 hours of professional learning per year on assisting pupils with dyslexia. (3) As used in this section, "Orton-Gillingham approach principles" means a teaching approach for pupils with reading difficulties that does all of the following: (a) Incorporates phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary, fluency, and comprehension into daily lessons. (b) Teaches reading using a proven, multisensory approach. (c) Breaks reading and spelling down into smaller skills involving letters and sounds, and then builds on those skills over time. (d) Uses multisensory teaching strategies to teach reading by using sight, hearing, touch, and movement to help pupils connect and learn the concepts that are being taught.